Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 12
CHARGES FOR PATIENTS

27-12-101 to 27-12-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article repealed, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 675, § 1, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 7 of chapter 71, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2010, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to article 92 of this title. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said article and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.